Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.230

Liability of agent.

The agent shall be liable on his or her bond for the care and preservation of the estate while in his or her hands, and for the payment of the funds to the county treasury, and may be sued thereon by any person interested including the state.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2074; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.230. Prior: 1955 ex.s. c 7 s 5; 1917 c 156 s 168; RRS s 1538.]